Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.029

Application of chapter to adult family home providers—Governor as public employer—Procedure—Intent.

(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to the governor with respect to adult family home providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the governor is the public employer of adult family home providers who, solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees. The public employer shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the governor's designee.

(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, between the governor and adult family home providers, except as follows:

(a) A statewide unit of all adult family home providers is the only unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW 41.56.060.

(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of adult family home providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW 41.56.070.

Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention filed under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for adult family home providers under this section shall be limited solely to: (i) Economic compensation, such as manner and rate of subsidy and reimbursement, including tiered reimbursements; (ii) health and welfare benefits; (iii) professional development and training; (iv) labor-management committees; (v) grievance procedures; and (vi) other economic matters. Retirement benefits shall not be subject to collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of adult family home providers, except that:

(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement.

(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not binding on the state.

(e) Adult family home providers do not have the right to strike.

(3) Adult family home providers who are public employees solely for the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining relationship between the employer and adult family home providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4) This section does not create or modify:

(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term care services under chapter 70.128 RCW, including determination of the level of care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core responsibility affects hours of work for adult family home providers. This subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining over an individual consumer's plan of care;

(b) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver granted by the federal department of health and human services and to ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the services;

(c) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to the delivery of state services under chapter 70.128 RCW, including standards of eligibility of consumers and adult family home providers participating in the programs under chapter 70.128 RCW, and the nature of services provided. The governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights described in this subsection (4)(c);

(d) The residents', parents', or legal guardians' right to choose and terminate the services of any licensed adult family home provider; and

(e) RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, or 74.15.130.

(5) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (6) of this section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement.

(6) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the legislature unless the request has been:

(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(b) Certified by the director of financial management as financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this section.

(7) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the agreement.

(8) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(9) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.

(10) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the joint activities of adult family home providers and their exclusive bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized by this chapter.

[ 2007 c 184 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2007 c 184: "Part headings used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2007 c 184 s 9.]

Severability—2007 c 184: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2007 c 184 s 10.]

Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 184: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 2007 c 184 s 11.]